Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5125.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 15-15-1 and 15-15-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 15-15 entitled
"Domestic Abuse Prevention" are hereby amended to read as follows:
15-15-1. Definitions.
The following words as used in this chapter have the following meanings:
(1) “Course of conduct” means a pattern of conduct composed of a series of acts over a
period of time, evidencing a continuity of purpose. Constitutionally protected activity is not
included within the meaning of “course of conduct.”
(2) “Courts” means the family court.
(3) “Cyberstalking” means transmitting any communication by computer to any person or
causing any person to be contacted for the sole purpose of harassing that person or his or her family.
(4) “Domestic abuse” means:
The occurrence of one or more of the following acts between present or former family
members, parents, stepparents, a plaintiff parent’s minor child(ren) to which the defendant is not a
blood relative or relative by marriage, adult plaintiffs who are or have been in a substantive dating
or engagement relationship within the past one year and who are (either individually or together)
parents of minor children, or persons who are or have been in a substantive dating or engagement
relationship within the past one year in which at least one of the persons is a minor:
(i) Attempting to cause or causing physical harm;
(ii) Placing another in fear of imminent serious physical harm;

(iii) Causing another to engage involuntarily in sexual relations by force, threat of force, or
duress; or
(iv) Stalking or cyberstalking.
(5) “Harassing” means following a knowing and willful course of conduct directed at a
specific person with the intent to seriously alarm, annoy, or bother the person, and which serves no
legitimate purpose. The course of conduct must be such as would cause a reasonable person to
suffer substantial emotional distress, or be in fear of bodily injury.
(6) "Household pet" means a domesticated or tamed animal kept for companionship or
pleasure.
(6)(7) “Parents” mean persons who together are the legal parents of one or more children,
regardless of their marital status or whether they have lived together at any time.
(7)(8) “Present or former family member” means the spouse, former spouse, minor
children, stepchildren, a plaintiff parent’s minor child(ren) to which the defendant is not a blood
relative or relative by marriage, minor children of substantive dating partners, or persons who are
related by blood or marriage.
(8)(9) “Sexual exploitation” means the occurrence of any of the following acts by any
person who knowingly or willfully encourages, aids, or coerces any child under the age of eighteen
(18) years:
(i) Recruiting, employing, enticing, soliciting, isolating, harboring, transporting, providing,
persuading, obtaining, or maintaining, or so attempting, any minor for the purposes of commercial
sex acts or sexually explicit performances; or selling or purchasing a minor for the purposes of
commercial sex acts.
(A) “Commercial sex act” means any sex act or sexually explicit performance on account
of which anything of value is given, promised to, or received, directly or indirectly, by any person.
(B) “Sexually explicit performance” means an act or show, intended to arouse, satisfy the
sexual desires of, or appeal to the prurient interests of patrons or viewers, whether public or private,
live, photographed, recorded, or videotaped.
(9)(10) “Stalking” means harassing another person or willfully, maliciously, and repeatedly
following another person with the intent to place that person in reasonable fear of bodily injury.
(10)(11) “Substantive dating” or “engagement relationship” means a significant and
personal/intimate relationship that shall be adjudged by the court’s consideration of the following
factors:
(i) The length of time of the relationship;
(ii) The type of relationship; and
LC000107 - Page 2 of 8

(iii) The frequency of interaction between the parties.
15-15-3. Protective orders — Penalty — Jurisdiction.
(a) A person, or a parent, custodian, or legal guardian on behalf of a minor child or the
director of the department of children, youth and families (“DCYF”) or its designee for a child in
the custody of DCYF, pursuant to §§ 40-11-7 and 40-11-7.1, suffering from domestic abuse or
sexual exploitation as defined in § 15-15-1, may file a complaint in the family court requesting any
order that will protect and support her or him from abuse or sexual exploitation, including, but not
limited to, the following:
(1) Ordering that the defendant be restrained and enjoined from contacting, assaulting,
molesting, sexually exploiting, or interfering with the plaintiff at home, on the street, or elsewhere,
whether the defendant is an adult or a minor;
(2) Ordering the defendant to vacate the household immediately, and further providing in
the order for the safety and welfare of all household animals and pets;
(3) Awarding the plaintiff custody of the minor children of the parties, if any;
(4) Awarding the plaintiff custody of the household pet(s), if any, including the
enforcement remedy of a restraining order or other injunctive relief if necessary;
(4)(5) Ordering the defendant to surrender physical possession of all firearms in his or her
possession, care, custody, or control and shall further order a person restrained not to purchase or
receive, or attempt to purchase or receive, any firearms while the protective order is in effect. The
defendant shall surrender said firearms within twenty-four (24) hours of notice of the protective
order to the Rhode Island state police or local police department or to a federally licensed firearms
dealer.
(i) A person ordered to surrender possession of any firearm(s) pursuant to this section shall,
within seventy-two (72) hours after being served with the order, either:
(A) File with the court a receipt showing the firearm(s) was physically surrendered to the
Rhode Island state police or local police department, or to a federally licensed firearms dealer; or
(B) Attest to the court that, at the time of the order, the person had no firearms in his or her
immediate physical possession or control, or subject to their immediate physical possession or
control, and that the person, at the time of the attestation, has no firearms in their immediate
physical possession or control, or subject to their immediate physical possession or control.
(ii) If a person restrained under this section transfers a firearm(s) to a federally licensed
firearms dealer pursuant to this section, the person restrained under this section may instruct the
federally licensed firearms dealer to sell the firearm(s) or to transfer ownership, in accordance with
state and federal law, to a qualified named individual who is not a member of the person’s dwelling
LC000107 - Page 3 of 8

house, who is not related to the person by blood, marriage, or relationship as defined by § 15-15-
1(7) § 15-15-1, and who is not prohibited from possessing firearms under state or federal law. The
owner of any firearm(s) sold shall receive any financial value received from its sale, less the cost
associated with taking possession of, storing, and transferring of the firearm(s).
(iii) Every individual to whom ownership of a firearm(s) is transferred pursuant to this
subsection shall be prohibited from transferring or returning any firearm(s) to the person restrained
under this section while the protective order remains in effect and shall be informed of this
prohibition, Any knowing violation of this subsection is a felony that shall be punishable by a fine
of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment for a term of not less than one
year and not more than five (5) years, or both.
(iv) An individual to whom ownership of a firearm(s) is transferred pursuant to this
subsection shall return a firearm(s) to the person formerly restrained under this section only if the
person formerly restrained under this section provides documentation issued by a court indicating
that the restraining order issued pursuant to this section that prohibited the person from purchasing,
carrying, transporting, or possessing firearms has expired and has not been extended; and
(5)(6) After notice to the respondent and a hearing, ordering either party to make payments
for the support of a minor child or children of the parties as required by law for a period not to
exceed ninety (90) days, unless the child support order is for a child or children receiving public
assistance pursuant to chapter 5.1 of title 40 [repealed]. In these cases, legal counsel for the division
of taxation, child support enforcement, shall be notified as a party in interest to appear for the
purpose of establishing a child support order under a new or existing docket number previously
assigned to the parties and not under the protective docket number. The child support order shall
remain in effect until the court modifies or suspends the order.
(b) After notice to the respondent and a hearing, which shall be held within fifteen (15)
days of surrendering said firearms, the court, in addition to any other restrictions, may, for any
protective order issued after or renewed on or after July 1, 2017, continue the order of surrender,
and shall further order a person restrained under this section not to purchase or receive, or attempt
to purchase or receive, any firearms while the protective order is in effect.
(c) The family court shall provide a notice on all forms requesting a protective order that a
person restrained under this section shall be ordered pursuant to § 11-47-5 to surrender possession
of any firearms while the protective order is in effect. The form shall further provide that any person
who has surrendered his or her firearms shall be afforded a hearing within fifteen (15) days of
surrendering his or her firearms.
(d) Any firearm surrendered in accordance with this section to the Rhode Island state police
LC000107 - Page 4 of 8

or local police department shall be returned to the person formerly restrained under this section
upon the person’s request when:
(1) The person formerly restrained under this section produces documentation issued by a
court indicating that the restraining order issued pursuant to this section that prohibited the person
from purchasing, carrying, transporting, or possessing firearms has expired and has not been
extended; and
(2) The law enforcement agency in possession of the firearms determined that the person
formerly restrained under this section is not otherwise prohibited from possessing a firearm under
state or federal law.
(3) The person required to surrender their firearms pursuant to this section shall not be
responsible for any costs of storage of any firearms surrendered pursuant to this section.
(e) The Rhode Island state police are authorized to develop rules and procedures pertaining
to the storage and return of firearms surrendered to the Rhode Island state police or local police
departments pursuant to this section. The Rhode Island state police may consult with the Rhode
Island Police Chiefs’ Association in developing rules and procedures.
(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit, expand, or in any way modify orders
issued under § 12-29-7 or § 15-5-19.
(g) Nothing in this section shall limit a defendant’s right under existing law to petition the
court at a later date for modification of the order.
(h) The court shall immediately notify the person suffering from domestic abuse whose
complaint gave rise to the protective order, and the law enforcement agency where the person
restrained under this section resides, of the hearing.
(i) The person suffering from domestic abuse, local law enforcement, and the person
restrained under this section shall all have an opportunity to be present and to testify when the court
considers the petition.
(j) At the hearing, the person restrained under this section shall have the burden of showing,
by clear and convincing evidence, that, if his or her firearm rights were restored, he or she would
not pose a danger to the person suffering from domestic abuse or to any other person.
(1) In determining whether to restore a person’s firearm rights, the court shall examine all
relevant evidence, including, but not limited to: the complaint seeking a protective order; the
criminal record of the person restrained under this section; the mental health history of the person
restrained under this section; any evidence that the person restrained under this section has, since
being served with the order, engaged in violent or threatening behavior against the person suffering
from domestic abuse or any other person.
LC000107 - Page 5 of 8

(2) If the court determines, after a review of all relevant evidence and after all parties have
had an opportunity to be heard, that the person restrained under this section would not pose a danger
to the person suffering from domestic abuse or to any other person if their firearm rights were
restored, then the court may grant the petition and modify the protective order and lift the firearm
prohibition.
(3) If the court lifts a person’s firearms prohibition pursuant to this subsection, the court
shall issue the person written notice that the person is no longer prohibited under this section from
purchasing or possessing firearms while the protective order is in effect.
(k) The prohibition against possessing a firearm(s) due solely to the existence of a domestic
violence restraining order issued under this section shall not apply with respect to sworn peace
officers as defined in § 12-7-21 and active members of military service, including members of the
reserve components thereof, who are required by law or departmental policy to carry departmental
firearms while on duty or any person who is required by their employment to carry a firearm in the
performance of their duties. Any individual exempted pursuant to this exception may possess a
firearm only during the course of their employment. Any firearm required for employment must be
stored at the place of employment when not being possessed for employment use; all other
firearm(s) must be surrendered in accordance with this section.
(l) Upon motion by the plaintiff, the plaintiff’s address shall be released only at the
discretion of the family court judge.
(m)(1) Any violation of the protective orders in subsection (a) of this section shall subject
the defendant to being found in contempt of court.
(2) The contempt order shall not be exclusive and shall not preclude any other available
civil or criminal remedies. Any relief granted by the court shall be for a fixed period of time not to
exceed three (3) years, at the expiration of which time the court may extend any order, upon motion
of the plaintiff, for any additional time, that it deems necessary to protect the plaintiff from abuse.
The court may modify its order at any time upon motion of either party.
(n)(1) Any violation of a protective order under this chapter of which the defendant has
actual notice shall be a misdemeanor that shall be punished by a fine of no more than one thousand
dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or both. Beginning July 1, 2025,
said violation shall be prosecuted by an attorney appointed by the prosecuting authority who shall
self-certify that they have successfully completed a specialized domestic violence prosecution
training course and updated training every four (4) years thereafter, aligned with national best
practices and eligible for continuing legal education credit(s) as approved by the Rhode Island Bar
Association.
LC000107 - Page 6 of 8

(2) The penalties for violation of this section shall also include the penalties as provided
by § 12-29-5.
(o) Actual notice means that the defendant has received a copy of the order by service or
by being handed a copy of the order by a police officer pursuant to § 15-15-5(d).
(p)(1) The district court shall have criminal jurisdiction over all adult violations of this
chapter.
(2) The family court shall have jurisdiction over all juvenile violations of this chapter.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000107
========
LC000107 - Page 7 of 8